Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-2475
Prescription, defined.

Prescription means an order for a drug or device issued by a practitioner for a specific patient, for emergency use, or for use in immunizations. Prescription does not include a chart order.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 19.
August 30, 2015